Utah statutes.
32A-11a-107 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Sale or transfer of business assets or ownership.

(1)  Without the prior written approval of a sale or transfer by the supplier:

(a)  a wholesaler may not sell or transfer its business, or any portion of its business, including the distributorship agreement to a successor in interest; and

(b)  the owner of an interest in a wholesaler may not sell or transfer all or part of the owner's interest in the wholesaler to a successor in interest.

(2)  A supplier may not unreasonably withhold or delay its approval of a sale or transfer, including the wholesaler's rights and obligations under the terms of the distributorship agreement, if the person to be substituted meets reasonable standards that are imposed:

(a)  by the supplier pursuant to the distributorship agreement; and

(b)  on other wholesalers of that supplier of the same general class, taking into account the size and location of the sales territory and market to be served.

(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a wholesaler may not assign or transfer its license in violation of Subsection 32A-11-106(7).

